Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.280

Possession of cattle or horse marked with another's brand—Penalty.

(1) No person shall knowingly have possession of any cattle or horse marked with a recorded brand of another person unless the:

(a) Cattle or horse lawfully bears the person's own healed recorded brand;

(b) Cattle or horse is accompanied by a certificate of permit from the owner of the recorded brand;

(c) Cattle or horse is accompanied by an inspection certificate;

(d) Cattle are accompanied by a self-inspection certificate meeting the requirements of RCW 16.57.010;

(e) Horse is accompanied by a bill of sale from the previous owner; or

(f) Cattle or horse is accompanied by other satisfactory proof of ownership as designated in rule.

(2) A violation of this section constitutes a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2010 c 66 s 11; 2003 c 326 s 34; 1995 c 374 s 52; 1991 c 110 s 5; 1959 c 54 s 28.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.